North Dakota, session 69, HB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-60-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-60-02. Imposition of taxes. (Effective throughafter June 30, 2026 , and through June 30 ,
2031)
There is hereby imposed upon the operator of each coal conversion facility a tax paid monthly for
the privilege of producing products of such coal conversion facility. The rate of the tax must be
computed as follows:
1. For all coal conversion facilities, except as otherwise provided in this section, the tax is
measured by the gross receipts derived from the facility for the preceding month and is in the
amount of two percent of its gross receipts. Gross receipts derived from the sale of a capital
asset are not subject to the tax imposed by this subsection.
2. For electrical generating plants, the tax is at a rate of sixty-five one-hundredths of one mill
times sixty percent of the installed capacity of each unit times the number of hours in the
taxable period. All electrical energy generating units that begin construction or complete
repowering are exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this subsection for five
years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the first taxable
production after repowering from the unit. If a unit is incapable of generating electricity for
eighteen consecutive months, the tax on that unit for taxable periods beginning after the
eighteenth month must be reduced by the ratio that the cost of repair of the unit bears to the
original cost of the unit. This reduced rate remains in effect until the unit is capable of
generating electricity.
3. For electrical generating plants, in addition to the tax imposed by subsection 2, there is a tax
at the rate of twenty-five one-hundredths of one mill on each kilowatt hour of electricity
produced for the purpose of sale. For all electrical generating plants that begin construction or
complete repowering, the production from the plants is exempt from the tax imposed by this
subsection for five years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the
first taxable production after repowering from the plant.
4. For coal gasification plants, the tax is the greater of either the amount provided in subsection 1
or thirteen and one-half cents on each one thousand cubic feet [28316.85 liters] of synthetic
natural gas produced for the purpose of sale but not including any amount of synthetic natural
gas in excess of one hundred ten million cubic feet per day.
5. For all coal conversion facilities, other than electrical generating plants, the production from
the facilities is exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this section for a period

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 2
of five years from the date of first taxable production from the facility. The operator of each
facility applying for exemption under this subsection shall certify to the tax commissioner the
date of first taxable production of the facility.
6. For coal beneficiation plants, the tax is twenty cents on each ton of two thousand pounds
[907.18 kilograms] of beneficiated coal produced for the purpose of sale, or one and
one-quarter percent of the gross receipts derived from such facility for the preceding month,
whichever amount is greater. Any amount of beneficiated coal produced in excess of eighty
percent of the design capacity of the coal beneficiation plant or produced for use within a coal
conversion facility is exempt from such tax.
7. With the exception of the tax imposed under subsection 3, the board of county commissioners,
by resolution, may grant the operator of a plant or facility located within the county a partial or
complete exemption from up to fifteen percent of the tax imposed under this section for a
period not to extend past June 30, 20262031. If a board of county commissioners grants a
partial or complete exemption for a specific plant or facility under this subsection, subsection 2
of section 57-60-14 does not apply. Notwithstanding section 57-60-14, any tax collected from
a plant or facility subject to the exemption provided by this subsection must be allocated
entirely to the county for allocation as provided in section 57-60-15.
Imposition of taxes. (Effective after June 30, 20262031) There is hereby imposed upon the
operator of each coal conversion facility a tax paid monthly for the privilege of producing products of
such coal conversion facility. The rate of the tax must be computed as follows:
1. For all coal conversion facilities, except as otherwise provided in this section, the tax is
measured by the gross receipts derived from the facility for the preceding month and is in the
amount of two percent of its gross receipts. Gross receipts derived from the sale of a capital
asset are not subject to the tax imposed by this subsection.
2. For electrical generating plants, the tax is at a rate of sixty-five one-hundredths of one mill
times sixty percent of the installed capacity of each unit times the number of hours in the
taxable period. All electrical energy generating units that begin construction or complete
repowering are exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this subsection for five
years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the first taxable
production after repowering from the unit. The board of county commissioners may, by
resolution, grant to the operator of an electrical generating plant located within the county
partial or complete exemption from the remaining fifteen percent of the tax imposed by this
subsection for a period not exceeding five years from the date of the first taxable production or
from the date of the first taxable production after repowering from the unit. If a board of county
commissioners grants a partial or complete exemption for a specific coal conversion facility
under this subsection, the provisions of subsection 2 of section 57-60-14 do not apply as that
subsection relates to revenue from the specific unit of the coal conversion facility for which the
partial or complete exemption has been granted. Notwithstanding section 57-60-14, any tax
collected from a unit subject to the exemption provided by this subsection must be allocated
entirely to the county for allocation as provided in section 57-60-15. If a unit is incapable of
generating electricity for eighteen consecutive months, the tax on that unit for taxable periods
beginning after the eighteenth month must be reduced by the ratio that the cost of repair of the
unit bears to the original cost of the unit. This reduced rate remains in effect until the unit is
capable of generating electricity.
3. For electrical generating plants, in addition to the tax imposed by subsection 2, there is a tax
at the rate of twenty-five one-hundredths of one mill on each kilowatt hour of electricity
produced for the purpose of sale. For all electrical generating plants that begin construction or
complete repowering, the production from the plants is exempt from the tax imposed by this
subsection for five years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the
first taxable production after repowering from the plant.

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 3
4. For coal gasification plants, the tax is the greater of either the amount provided in subsection 1
or thirteen and one-half cents on each one thousand cubic feet [28316.85 liters] of synthetic
natural gas produced for the purpose of sale but not including any amount of synthetic natural
gas in excess of one hundred ten million cubic feet per day.
5. a. For all coal conversion facilities, other than electrical generating plants, the production
from the facilities is exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this section for
a period of five years from the date of first taxable production from the facility. The
operator of each facility applying for exemption under this subsection shall certify to the
tax commissioner the date of first taxable production of the facility.
b. The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, grant to the operator of a coal
conversion facility, other than an electrical generating plant, located within the county a
partial or complete exemption from the remaining fifteen percent of tax imposed by this
section for a period not exceeding five years from the date of the first taxable production
from the facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-60-14, any tax collected
which is based upon the production of a facility subject to the exemption provided by this
subsection must be allocated entirely to the county for allocation as provided in section
57-60-15.
6. For coal beneficiation plants, the tax is twenty cents on each ton of two thousand pounds
[907.18 kilograms] of beneficiated coal produced for the purpose of sale, or one and
one-quarter percent of the gross receipts derived from such facility for the preceding month,
whichever amount is greater. Any amount of beneficiated coal produced in excess of eighty
percent of the design capacity of the coal beneficiation plant or produced for use within a coal
conversion facility is exempt from such tax.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 57-60-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-60-02. Imposition of taxes. (Effective after June 30, 2026, and through June 30, 2031)
There is hereby imposed upon the operator of each coal conversion facility a tax paid monthly for
the privilege of producing products of such coal conversion facility. The rate of the tax must be
computed as follows:
1. For all coal conversion facilities, except as otherwise provided in this section, the tax is
measured by the gross receipts derived from the facility for the preceding month and is in the
amount of two percent of its gross receipts. Gross receipts derived from the sale of a capital
asset are not subject to the tax imposed by this subsection.
2. For electrical generating plants, the tax is at a rate of sixty-five one-hundredths of one mill
times sixty percent of the installed capacity of each unit times the number of hours in the
taxable period. All electrical energy generating units that begin construction or complete
repowering are exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this subsection for five
years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the first taxable
production after repowering from the unit. If a unit is incapable of generating electricity for
eighteen consecutive months, the tax on that unit for taxable periods beginning after the
eighteenth month must be reduced by the ratio that the cost of repair of the unit bears to the
original cost of the unit. This reduced rate remains in effect until the unit is capable of
generating electricity.
3. For electrical generating plants, in addition to the tax imposed by subsection 2, there is a tax
at the rate of twenty-five one-hundredths of one mill on each kilowatt hour of electricity
produced for the purpose of sale. For all electrical generating plants that begin construction or
complete repowering, the production from the plants is exempt from the tax imposed by this
subsection for five years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the
first taxable production after repowering from the plant.

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 4
4. For coal gasification plants, the tax is the greater of either the amount provided in subsection 1
or thirteen and one-half cents on each one thousand cubic feet [28316.85 liters] of synthetic
natural gas produced for the purpose of sale but not including any amount of synthetic natural
gas in excess of one hundred ten million cubic feet per day.
5. For all coal conversion facilities, other than electrical generating plants, the production from
the facilities is exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this section for a period
of five years from the date of first taxable production from the facility. The operator of each
facility applying for exemption under this subsection shall certify to the tax commissioner the
date of first taxable production of the facility.
6. For coal beneficiation plants, the tax is twenty cents on each ton of two thousand pounds
[907.18 kilograms] of beneficiated coal produced for the purpose of sale, or one and
one-quarter percent of the gross receipts derived from such facility for the preceding month,
whichever amount is greater. Any amount of beneficiated coal produced in excess of eighty
percent of the design capacity of the coal beneficiation plant or produced for use within a coal
conversion facility is exempt from such tax.
7. With the exception of the tax imposed under subsection 3, the board of county commissioners,
by resolution, may grant the operator of a plant or facility located within the county a partial or
complete exemption from up to fifteen percent of the tax imposed under this section for a
period not to extend past June 30, 2031. If a board of county commissioners grants a partial or
complete exemption for a specific plant or facility under this subsection, subsection 2 of
section 57-60-14 does not apply. Notwithstanding section 57-60-14, any tax collected from a
plant or facility subject to the exemption provided by this subsection must be allocated entirely
to the county for allocation as provided in section 57-60-15.
Imposition of taxes. (Effective after June 30, 2031) There is hereby imposed upon the operator
of each coal conversion facility a tax paid monthly for the privilege of producing products of such coal
conversion facility. The rate of the tax must be computed as follows:
1. For all coal conversion facilities, except as otherwise provided in this section, the tax is
measured by the gross receipts derived from the facility for the preceding month and is in the
amount of two percent of its gross receipts. Gross receipts derived from the sale of a capital
asset are not subject to the tax imposed by this subsection.
2. For electrical generating plants, the tax is at a rate of sixty-five one-hundredths of one mill
times sixty percent of the installed capacity of each unit times the number of hours in the
taxable period. All electrical energy generating units that begin construction or complete
repowering are exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this subsection for five
years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the first taxable
production after repowering from the unit. The board of county commissioners may, by
resolution, grant to the operator of an electrical generating plant located within the county
partial or complete exemption from the remaining fifteen percent of the tax imposed by this
subsection for a period not exceeding five years from the date of the first taxable production or
from the date of the first taxable production after repowering from the unit. If a board of county
commissioners grants a partial or complete exemption for a specific coal conversion facility
under this subsection, the provisions of subsection 2 of section 57-60-14 do not apply as that
subsection relates to revenue from the specific unit of the coal conversion facility for which the
partial or complete exemption has been granted. Notwithstanding section 57-60-14, any tax
collected from a unit subject to the exemption provided by this subsection must be allocated
entirely to the county for allocation as provided in section 57-60-15. If a unit is incapable of
generating electricity for eighteen consecutive months, the tax on that unit for taxable periods
beginning after the eighteenth month must be reduced by the ratio that the cost of repair of the
unit bears to the original cost of the unit. This reduced rate remains in effect until the unit is
capable of generating electricity.

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 5
3. For electrical generating plants, in addition to the tax imposed by subsection 2, there is a tax
at the rate of twenty-five one-hundredths of one mill on each kilowatt hour of electricity
produced for the purpose of sale. For all electrical generating plants that begin construction or
complete repowering, the production from the plants is exempt from the tax imposed by this
subsection for five years from the date of the first taxable production or from the date of the
first taxable production after repowering from the plant.
4. For coal gasification plants, the tax is the greater of either the amount provided in subsection 1
or thirteen and one-half cents on each one thousand cubic feet [28316.85 liters] of synthetic
natural gas produced for the purpose of sale but not including any amount of synthetic natural
gas in excess of one hundred ten million cubic feet per day.
5. a. For all coal conversion facilities, other than electrical generating plants, the production
from the facilities is exempt from eighty-five percent of the tax imposed by this section for
a period of five years from the date of first taxable production from the facility. The
operator of each facility applying for exemption under this subsection shall certify to the
tax commissioner the date of first taxable production of the facility.
b. The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, grant to the operator of a coal
conversion facility, other than an electrical generating plant, located within the county a
partial or complete exemption from the remaining fifteen percent of tax imposed by this
section for a period not exceeding five years from the date of the first taxable production
from the facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-60-14, any tax collected
which is based upon the production of a facility subject to the exemption provided by this
subsection must be allocated entirely to the county for allocation as provided in section
57-60-15.
6. For coal beneficiation plants, the tax is twenty cents on each ton of two thousand pounds
[907.18 kilograms] of beneficiated coal produced for the purpose of sale, or one and
one-quarter percent of the gross receipts derived from such facility for the preceding month,
whichever amount is greater. Any amount of beneficiated coal produced in excess of eighty
percent of the design capacity of the coal beneficiation plant or produced for use within a coal
conversion facility is exempt from such tax.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-60-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-60-02.1. Carbon dioxide capture credit - Reporting requirement.
A coal conversion facility that achieves a twenty percent capture of carbon dioxide emissions during
a taxable period is entitled to a twenty percent reduction in the state generallegacy fund share of the tax
imposed under section 57-60-02 during that taxable period. The facility is entitled to an additional
reduction of one percent of the state generallegacy fund share of the tax imposed under section
57-60-02 for every additional two percentage points of its capture of carbon dioxide emissions. A
maximum fifty percent reduction of the state generallegacy fund share of the tax imposed under section
57-60-02 is allowed for eighty percent or more capture of carbon dioxide emissions. A coal conversion
facility may receive the reduction in coal conversion tax under this section for ten years from the date of
first capture of carbon dioxide emission or for ten years from the date the coal conversion facility is
eligible to receive the credit. A coal conversion facility that met the carbon dioxide capture requirements
before January 1, 2017, may not claim the reduction under this section.
The operator of a coal conversion facility that receives a credit under this section shall report
annually to the legislative council. The report must include:
1. An overview of the carbon dioxide capture project.

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 6
2. A status report on the current state of the carbon dioxide capture project, including data on the
amount of carbon dioxide produced from the facility before the carbon dioxide capture project
and the current carbon dioxide produced and captured from the facility.
3. Any recent changes to enhance the carbon dioxide capture system.
4. Information on the status of federal law and regulations related to the carbon dioxide capture
project, including any benefits from the project realized by the operator under federal law and
regulations.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 57-60-02.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-60-02.2. Coal conversion facility tax - Exemption - Lignite research tax - Imposition.
(Effective throughafter June 30, 2026 , and through June 30, 2031 )
1. a. Excluding the generation tax imposed under subsection 3 of section 57-60-02, a coal
conversion facility is exempt from eighty-five percententitled to a partial exemption from
the coal conversion state share of the tax imposed under section 57-60-02 and
insteadequal to:
(1) Ninety percent of the coal conversion state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2026, and through June 30, 2027 .
(2) Eighty percent of the coal conversion state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2027, and through June 30, 2028 .
(3) Seventy percent of the coal conversion state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2028, and through June 30, 2029 .
(4) Sixty percent of the coal conversion state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2029, and through June 30, 2030 .
(5) Thirty-five percent of the coal conversion state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2030, and through June 30, 2031 .
b. The coal conversion facility shall pay a lignite research tax equal to eighty-five percent of
the tax imposed under section 57-60-02 before the application of the exemption under
subdivision a , multiplied by five percent.
c. For purposes of this subsection, "coal conversion state share" means eighty-five percent
of the tax imposed under section 57 - 60 - 02, excluding the generation tax imposed under
subsection 3 of section 57 - 60 - 02 .
2. a. An electrical generating plant is exempt fromentitled to a partial exemption from the
generation tax imposed under subsection 3 of section 57-60-02 and insteadequal to:
(1) Ninety percent of the generating plant state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2026, and through June 30, 2027 .
(2) Eighty percent of the generating plant state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2027, and through June 30, 2028 .
(3) Seventy percent of the generating plant state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2028, and through June 30, 2029 .
(4) Sixty percent of the generating plant state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2029, and through June 30, 2030 .

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 7
(5) Thirty-five percent of the generating plant state share for taxable production after
June 30, 2030, and through June 30, 2031 .
b. The electrical generating plant shall pay a lignite research tax equal to the tax imposed
under subsection 3 of section 57-60-02 before the application of the exemption under
subdivision a , multiplied by five percent.
c. For purposes of this subsection, the "generating plant state share" means one hundred
percent of the generation tax imposed under subsection 3 of section 57 - 60 - 02 .
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 57-60-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-60-14. Allocation of revenue - Continuing appropriation. (Effective throughafter June 30,
2026 , and through June 30, 2031 )
1. At least quarterly, the state treasurer shall allocate:
a. The lignite research tax collections under section 57-60-02.2 to the lignite research fund
for the purposes under section 57-61-01.5.
b. The remaining portion of the coal conversion state share after the exemption under
section 57 - 60 - 02.2 to the legacy fund to become part of the principal of the legacy fund .
For purposes of this subdivision, "coal conversion state share" has the same meaning as
subsection 1 of section 57 - 60 - 02.2 .
c. The remaining portion of the generating plant state share after the exemption under
section 57 - 60 - 02.2 to the legacy fund to become part of the principal of the legacy fund .
For purposes of this subdivision, "generating plant state share" has the same meaning as
subsection 2 of section 57 - 60 - 02.2 .
d. The remaining coal conversion tax collections under section 57-60-02 to the county.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation under this section to each county
may not be less in each calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for each
county under this section in the immediately preceding calendar year. For a county that has
received less in a calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for that county
in the immediately preceding calendar year, not later than January tenth of the following year,
the county auditor shall calculate the amount that is due under this subsection and submit a
statement of the amount to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall verify the stated
amount and make the required payment under this subsection to the county, from collections
received under section 57-60-02, not later than March first of the following year. The funds
needed to make the distribution to counties under this subsection are appropriated on a
continuing basis for making these payments. Money received by a county under this
subsection must be distributed pursuant to section 57-60-15.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a county in which is located a coal conversion
facility that was not a coal conversion facility under this chapter before January 1, 2002, for
years after 2002, subsection 2 applies to allocations to that county under this section, except
that for a county described in this subsection, amounts received for any calendar year must be
allocated by the county in the same manner property taxes for the facility were allocated for
taxable year 2001.
Allocation of revenue - Continuing appropriation. (Effective after June 30, 20262031)
1. The state treasurer shall no less than quarterly allocate all moneys received from all coal
conversion facilities in each county pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, fifteen percent to
the county and eighty-five percent to the state general fund, except moneys received from the

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 8
tax imposed by subsection 3 of section 57-60-02, which must be deposited inallocated to the
state general fund. Five percent of all funds allocated to the state general fund pursuant to this
chapterFrom the amount allocated to the state under this subsection:
a. Five percent must be allocated to the lignite research fund, for the purposes defined in
section 57-61-01.5; and
b. The remaining amount must be deposited in the legacy fund to become part of the
principal of the legacy fund.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation under this section to each county
may not be less in each calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for each
county under this section in the immediately preceding calendar year. For a county that has
received less in a calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for that county
in the immediately preceding calendar year, not later than January tenth of the following year,
the county auditor shall calculate the amount that is due under this subsection and submit a
statement of the amount to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall verify the stated
amount and make the required payment under this subsection to the county, from collections
received under section 57-60-02, not later than March first of the following year. The funds
needed to make the distribution to counties under this subsection are appropriated on a
continuing basis for making these payments. Money received by a county under this
subsection must be distributed pursuant to section 57-60-15.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a county in which is located a coal conversion
facility that was not a coal conversion facility under this chapter before January 1, 2002, for
years after 2002, subsection 2 applies to allocations to that county under this section, except
that for a county described in this subsection, amounts received for any calendar year must be
allocated by the county in the same manner property taxes for the facility were allocated for
taxable year 2001.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 57-60-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-60-14. Allocation of revenue - Continuing appropriation. (Effective after June 30, 2026,
and through June 30, 2031)
1. At least quarterly, the state treasurer shall allocate:
a. The lignite research tax collections under section 57-60-02.2 to the lignite research fund
for the purposes under section 57-61-01.5.
b. The remaining portion of the coal conversion state share after the exemption under
section 57-60-02.2 to the legacy fund to become part of the principal of the legacy fund.
For purposes of this subdivision, "coal conversion state share" has the same meaning as
subsection 1 of section 57-60-02.2.
c. The remaining portion of the generating plant state share after the exemption under
section 57-60-02.2 to the legacy fund to become part of the principal of the legacy fund.
For purposes of this subdivision, "generating plant state share" has the same meaning as
subsection 2 of section 57-60-02.2.
d. The remaining coal conversion tax collections under section 57-60-02 to the county.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation under this section to each county
may not be less in each calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for each
county under this section in the immediately preceding calendar year. For a county that has
received less in a calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for that county
in the immediately preceding calendar year, not later than January tenth of the following year,

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 9
the county auditor shall calculate the amount that is due under this subsection and submit a
statement of the amount to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall verify the stated
amount and make the required payment under this subsection to the county, from collections
received under section 57-60-02, not later than March first of the following year. The funds
needed to make the distribution to counties under this subsection are appropriated on a
continuing basis for making these payments. Money received by a county under this
subsection must be distributed pursuant to section 57-60-15.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a county in which is located a coal conversion
facility that was not a coal conversion facility under this chapter before January 1, 2002, for
years after 2002, subsection 2 applies to allocations to that county under this section, except
that for a county described in this subsection, amounts received for any calendar year must be
allocated by the county in the same manner property taxes for the facility were allocated for
taxable year 2001.
Allocation of revenue - Continuing appropriation. (Effective after June 30, 2031)
1. The state treasurer shall no less than quarterly allocate all moneys received from all coal
conversion facilities in each county pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, fifteen percent to
the county and eighty-five percent to the state, except moneys received from the tax imposed
by subsection 3 of section 57-60-02, which must be allocated to the state. From the amount
allocated to the state under this subsection:
a. Five percent must be allocated to the lignite research fund, for the purposes defined in
section 57-61-01.5; and
b. The remaining amount must be deposited in the legacy fund to become part of the
principal of the legacy fund.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation under this section to each county
may not be less in each calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for each
county under this section in the immediately preceding calendar year. For a county that has
received less in a calendar year than the amount certified to the state treasurer for that county
in the immediately preceding calendar year, not later than January tenth of the following year,
the county auditor shall calculate the amount that is due under this subsection and submit a
statement of the amount to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall verify the stated
amount and make the required payment under this subsection to the county, from collections
received under section 57-60-02, not later than March first of the following year. The funds
needed to make the distribution to counties under this subsection are appropriated on a
continuing basis for making these payments. Money received by a county under this
subsection must be distributed pursuant to section 57-60-15.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a county in which is located a coal conversion
facility that was not a coal conversion facility under this chapter before January 1, 2002, for
years after 2002, subsection 2 applies to allocations to that county under this section, except
that for a county described in this subsection, amounts received for any calendar year must be
allocated by the county in the same manner property taxes for the facility were allocated for
taxable year 2001.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 57-61-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-61-01. Severance tax upon coal - Imposition - In lieu of sales and use taxes - Payment to
the tax commissioner. (Effective through June 30, 20262031)
1. There is hereby imposed upon all coal severed for sale or for industrial purposes by coal
mines within the state a tax of thirty-seven and one-half cents per ton of two thousand pounds
[907.18 kilograms]. The severance tax is in lieu of any sales or use taxes imposed by law.

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 10
Each coal mine owner or operator shall remit the tax for each month, within twenty-five days
after the end of each month, to the tax commissioner on reports and forms as the tax
commissioner deems necessary. For the purposes of this chapter, commercial leonardite is
taxed in the same manner as coal.
2. The board of county commissioners, by resolution, may grant to the operator of a mine from
which the coal or commercial leonardite is mined a partial or complete exemption from up to
seventy percent of the tax imposed under this section for a period not to extend past June 30,
20262031. Any tax revenue exceeding thirty percent of the tax imposed under this subsection
must be allocated to the county under subsection 3 of section 57-62-02.
Severance tax upon coal - Imposition - In lieu of sales and use taxes - Payment to the tax
commissioner. (Effective after June 30, 20262031) There is hereby imposed upon all coal severed
for sale or for industrial purposes by coal mines within the state a tax of thirty-seven and one-half cents
per ton of two thousand pounds [907.18 kilograms]. The severance tax is in lieu of any sales or use
taxes imposed by law. Each coal mine owner or operator shall remit the tax for each month, within
twenty-five days after the end of each month, to the tax commissioner on reports and forms as the tax
commissioner deems necessary. For the purposes of this chapter, commercial leonardite is taxed in the
same manner as coal.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 57-61-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-61-01. Severance tax upon coal - Imposition - In lieu of sales and use taxes - Payment to
the tax commissioner. (Effective through June 30, 2031)
1. There is hereby imposed upon all coal severed for sale or for industrial purposes by coal
mines within the state a tax of thirty-seven and one-half cents per ton of two thousand pounds
[907.18 kilograms]. The severance tax is in lieu of any sales or use taxes imposed by law.
Each coal mine owner or operator shall remit the tax for each month, within twenty-five days
after the end of each month, to the tax commissioner on reports and forms as the tax
commissioner deems necessary. For the purposes of this chapter, commercial leonardite is
taxed in the same manner as coal.
2. The board of county commissioners, by resolution, may grant to the operator of a mine from
which the coal or commercial leonardite is mined a partial or complete exemption from up to
seventy percent of the tax imposed under this section for a period not to extend past June 30,
2031. Any tax revenue exceeding thirty percent of the tax imposed under this subsection must
be allocated to the county under subsection 3 of section 57-62-02.
Severance tax upon coal - Imposition - In lieu of sales and use taxes - Payment to the tax
commissioner. (Effective after June 30, 2031) There is hereby imposed upon all coal severed for
sale or for industrial purposes by coal mines within the state a tax of thirty-seven and one-half cents per
ton of two thousand pounds [907.18 kilograms]. The severance tax is in lieu of any sales or use taxes
imposed by law. Each coal mine owner or operator shall remit the tax for each month, within twenty-five
days after the end of each month, to the tax commissioner on reports and forms as the tax
commissioner deems necessary. For the purposes of this chapter, commercial leonardite is taxed in the
same manner as coal.
SECTION 9. REPEAL. Section 57-60-02.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 7 of this Act is effective for taxable production beginning
after June 30, 2025. Sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of this Act are effective for taxable production beginning
after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 11. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 2, 6, 8, and 9 of this Act become
effective on the date the tax commissioner certifies to the legislative council that the production tax
credit for electricity from renewables under section 45 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 45] and

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 11
the clean electricity production tax credit under section 45Y of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C.
45Y] have been repealed, if the certification is received before June 30, 2031.

H. B. NO. 1279 - PAGE 12
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1279.
House Vote: Yeas 68 Nays 21 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State